Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2396
Custodial official; liability.

No custodial official shall be liable on his or her official bond as such custodial official for public money or public funds on deposit in a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution designated as a depository if the depository has furnished securities or provided a deposit guaranty bond, or any combination thereof, pursuant to the Public Funds Deposit Security Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 11;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 91;

Laws 2019, LB622, § 7.